Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education, in coordination with the
Department for Public Health, the Kentucky Board of Licensed Diabetes
Educators, or any other entity the department deems appropriate, shall
develop Type 1 diabetes informational materials for the parents and
guardians of students. The informational materials shall include but not be
limited to a:
1. Description of Type 1 diabetes;
2. Description of the risk factors and warning signs associated with Type
1 diabetes;
3. Description of the need for screening for early detection of Type 1
diabetes using a blood autoantibody test; and
4. Recommendation for parents and guardians to immediately consult
with their child's primary care provider to develop an appropriate
treatment plan if they believe that their child displays warning signs
associated with Type 1 diabetes or has received positive early detection
screening results. Parents and guardians shall be advised that a
treatment plan may include consultation with, and examination by, a
specialty health care provider licensed to practice medicine or
osteopathy, including but not limited to an endocrinologist.
(b) The department shall make the informational materials required by this
subsection available to school districts at no cost on the department's
website.
(2) Each local board of education and public charter school board of directors shall
Page 1 of 2
HB014110.100 - 1133 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:39 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 141/GA
make the Type 1 diabetes informational materials developed in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section available on the school or school district website, in
the main front entrance of each school, and in each family resource and youth
services center.
Page 2 of 2
HB014110.100 - 1133 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:39 PM GA